Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.060

Delegation—Health care practitioner duties.

(1) Prior to delegation of any of the functions in RCW 18.360.050, a health care practitioner shall determine to the best of his or her ability each of the following:

(a) That the task is within that health care practitioner's scope of licensure or authority;

(b) That the task is indicated for the patient;

(c) The appropriate level of supervision;

(d) That no law prohibits the delegation;

(e) That the person to whom the task will be delegated is competent to perform that task; and

(f) That the task itself is one that should be appropriately delegated when considering the following factors:

(i) That the task can be performed without requiring the exercise of judgment based on clinical knowledge;

(ii) That results of the task are reasonably predictable;

(iii) That the task can be performed without a need for complex observations or critical decisions;

(iv) That the task can be performed without repeated clinical assessments; and

(v)(A) For a medical assistant other than a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, that the task, if performed improperly, would not present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to the patient; and

(B) For a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, that the task, if performed improperly, is not likely to present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to the patient.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of protocols that do not involve clinical judgment and do not involve the administration of medications, other than vaccines.

[ 2013 c 128 s 4; 2012 c 153 s 7.]

NOTES:

Implementation—Effective date—2013 c 128: See notes following RCW 18.360.005.

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.